Illinois, session 104th, SB3959.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Welcome Home Illinois tax credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92027, each taxpayer who is a first-time homebuyer of a 10principal residence in the State during the taxable year is 11entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 12(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to $500. If 2 or 13more individuals who are not married purchase a principal 14residence, the amount of the credit allowed under this Section 15shall be allocated among those individuals in such manner as 16the Department may, by rule, prescribe. This Section does not 17apply if the taxpayer disposes of the residence before the 18close of the taxable year or if the residence ceases to be the 19principal residence of the taxpayer before the close of the 20taxable year. 21    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 22the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 23the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess   SB3959- 2 -LRB104 18268 HLH 31707 b1may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 25 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 3credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 4a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 5that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 6shall be applied first. 7    (c) As used in this Section, "first-time homebuyer" means 8an individual who acquires an ownership interest in the 9individual's principal residence during the taxable year if 10neither the individual nor the individual's spouse had a 11present ownership interest in a principal residence during the 123-year period ending on the date of the purchase of the 13principal residence to which this Section applies. 14    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 15250.  16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.